test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IIHL_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IIHL_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IIHL_STEM_1

     níihl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: níihl
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl
     níihl+V+RELATIVE: níihls
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: níihläsaa
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: níihläs
     níihl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: níihläsaang
     níihl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: níihläsga
     níihl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: níihläsaas
     níihl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: níihläsaa.ang
     níihl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'uuj
     níihl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'uujang
     níihl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: níihläsaa'uujang
     níihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: níihl'us
     níihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'ujaa
     níihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'uujaangaa
     níihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: níihläsaa'us
     níihl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: níihläsaa'ahlans
     níihl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: níihläseehl
     níihl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: níihl'uu
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'waa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'waa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'waang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: níihl'wägan
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'aawaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: níihl'aawaan
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: níihl'waas
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: níihl'aawaas
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'waa.ang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'aawaa.ang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'wägiinii
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'wägaangaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'wägaangaan
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: níihl'waaäsaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: níihl'waaäs
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: níihl'waaäsaang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: níihl'waaäsga
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'waaäsaas
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'waaäsaa.ang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'waa'uuj
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'waa'uujang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: níihl'waaäsaa'uujang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: níihl'waa'us
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'waa'ujaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'waa'uujaangaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'waaäsaa'us
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: níihl'waa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: níihl'waa'ahlanggan
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: níihl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: níihl'waa'ahlans
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: níihl'aawaa'ahlang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: níihl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: níihl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: níihl'waa'ahl
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: níihl'waaäseehl
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: níihl'ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'angga
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'anggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: níihl'anggan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'aangaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: níihl'aangaan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: níihl'ans
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: níihl'aangaas
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'angang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'aangaa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: níihl'anggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'anggiinii
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'anggaangaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'anggaangaan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: níihl'angäsaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: níihl'angäs
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: níihl'angäsaang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: níihl'angäsga
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'angäsaas
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'angäsaa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'uuj
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'uujang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: níihl'angäsaa'uujang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'us
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'ang'ujaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'uujaangaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'angäsaa'us
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: níihl'aang'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: níihl'aang'ahlanggan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: níihl'angäsaa'ahlans
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: níihl'aang'ahlans
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: níihl'aangaa'ahlang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: níihl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: níihl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: níihl'aang'ahl
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: níihl'angäseehl
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: níihl'ang'uu
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: níihl'ang'wägan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'ang'aawaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: níihl'ang'aawaan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: níihl'ang'waas
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: níihl'ang'aawaas
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'ang'waa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'ang'aawaa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'wägiinii
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'wägaangaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'wägaangaan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: níihl'ang'waaäsaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: níihl'ang'waaäs
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: níihl'ang'waaäsaang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: níihl'ang'waaäsga
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'ang'waaäsaas
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: níihl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: níihl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa'uuj
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa'uujang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: níihl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa'us
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: níihl'ang'waa'ujaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: níihl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: níihl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: níihl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: níihl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: níihl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: níihl'ang'waa'ahlans
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: níihl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: níihl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: níihl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: níihl'ang'waa'ahl
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: níihl'ang'waaäseehl
